Hawaii statutes.
§386-44 Effect of erroneous payment;
insanity of beneficiary. If an employer in good faith pays weekly benefits
to a dependent who is inferior in right to another dependent or with whom
another dependent is entitled to share, the payment shall discharge the
employer, unless and until such other dependent notifies the employer of such
other dependent's claim. In case the employer is in doubt as to the respective
rights of rival claimants, the employer may institute proceedings before the
director of labor and industrial relations for determination of the proper
beneficiary.

Benefits to a person who is insane shall be
paid to the person's guardian. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-43; HRS
§386-44; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Cited: 27 H. 431, 438 (1923).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next